Massachusetts, session 194th, S1859.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 4(2)(b) and 4(2)(c) of chapter 32 
or any other general or special law to the contrary, Walter Guertin shall receive a retirement 
allowance based upon the thirty-two years of creditable service calculated by the Attleboro 
Retirement Board as of the date of his retirement, November 17, 2017. 
SECTION 2. This act shall apply as of November 17, 2017, and the Attleboro Retirement 
Board shall pay to Walter Guertin any amounts owed between the date of retirement and the 
passage of this act. Said retirement allowance shall be subject to the provisions of section 103 of 
chapter 32.